Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1207
Musical and amusement organizations; rules and regulations.

The city council of each city, or village board of trustees of each village, making provision for any vocal, instrumental, or amusement organization as provided in sections 18-1201 to 18-1207, shall make and adopt all suitable and necessary rules, regulations, and bylaws concerning the government, organization, expenditures, and other necessary matters pertaining to such organization, and for that purpose shall appoint and designate three members of the city council or village board of trustees as a committee on municipal amusements and entertainments.

Laws 1915, c. 219, § 4, p. 488;

C.S.1922, § 4474;

C.S.1929, § 18-904;

R.S.1943, § 18-1207;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 81.